Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1,117
Bonds; issuance to procure surrender of notes and warrants; power of district; limit.

An irrigation district shall have power to issue bonds in consideration of the surrender and cancellation of its outstanding notes and warrants in an amount not exceeding by more than one thousand dollars the principal and interest of the notes and warrants surrendered.

Laws 1925, c. 128, § 4, p. 336;

C.S.1929, § 46-181;

R.S.1943, § 46-1,117.